Washington statutes.
RCW 36.28.180

Allowance for clothing and other incidentals.

A county may from available funds provide for an allowance for clothing and other incidentals necessary to the performance of official duties for the sheriff and his or her deputies.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4060; 1979 c 132 s 1; 1963 c 50 s 2.]